Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska27-1008
Rule 1008. Functions of judge and jury.

When the admissibility of other evidence of contents of writings, recordings, or photographs under these rules depends upon the fulfillment of a condition of fact, the question whether the condition has been fulfilled is ordinarily for the judge to determine. However, when an issue is raised (1) whether the asserted writing ever existed, or (2) whether another writing, recording, or photograph produced at the trial is the original, or (3) whether other evidence of contents correctly reflects the contents, the issue is for the trier of fact to determine as in the case of other issues of fact.

Laws 1975, LB 279, § 71.

The existence of a written employment contract, alleged by plaintiff and denied by defendant, was properly a question for the jury. Montgomery v. Quantum Labs, Inc., 198 Neb. 160, 251 N.W.2d 892 (1977).